Utah statutes.
67-4a-602.   Businesses not to circumvent requirements of chapter.

A corporation or business may not, through its articles of incorporation, by-laws, by private agreement, or otherwise, circumvent the unclaimed property process established by this chapter by making a private escheat that would:

(1)  take or divert funds or personal property into income;

(2)  divide funds or personal property among locatable patrons or stockholders;

(3)  place funds or personal property in education or other funds; or

(4)  divert funds or personal property by any other type of appropriation.



Enacted by Chapter 198, 1995 General Session

